Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 3. GUARDIANSHIP AND RELATED PROCEDURES

SUBTITLE Y. TEXAS PROBATE CODE: SCOPE, JURISDICTION, AND VENUE

SUBPART A. PROCEEDINGS IN REM

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.